fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vaippatarvikkeet > Vaippojen säilytysratkaisut: Vaippalaukun säilytysratkaisut; Vaippalaukut; Vaippojen telineet; Roikkuvat vaippojen säilytysratkaisut
da: Baby og småbørn > Bleskift > Ble – puslestation: Pusletaskestationer; Bletasker; Blestablere; Hængende puslestationer
ja: ベビー用品 > おむつ用品 > おむつ収納: おむつバッグオーガナイザー; おむつキャディ; おむつスタッカー; 吊り下げおむつ収納
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Pelenaštvo > Organizatori za pelene: Organizatori torbi za pelene; Torba organizator pelena; Torbe za slaganje pelena; Viseći organizatori za pelene
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Ornamentação > Organizadores de fraldas: Organizadores de malas de fraldas; Porta-fraldas; Empilhadores de fraldas; Organizadores para pendurar fraldas
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Pelenkázás > Pelenkarendezők: Pelenkatáska-rendezők; Pelenkakosarak; Pelenkatartók; Függő pelenkarendezők
sv: Baby och småbarn > Blöjbyte > Blöjförvaring: Skötväskeörvaringslösningar; Blöjbyxor; Blöjstapel; Hängande blöjörvaringslösningar
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม > ที่จัดระเบียบผ้าอ้อม: กระเป๋าผ้าอ้อมแบบจัดระบียบ; ตะกร้าจัดเก็บผ้าอ้อม; กระเป๋าจัดเก็บผ้าอ้อม; ที่จัดระเบียบผ้าอ้อมแบบแขวน
it: Bebè e bimbi > Cambio pannolini > Contenitori per pannolini: Organizzatori di borse per pannolini; Portapannolini; Impilatori di pannolini; Organizzatori per pannolini appesi
ru: Товары для детей > Пеленание > Органайзеры для пеленания: Сумки-органайзеры для пеленания; Коробки-органайзеры для пеленания; Мешки для подгузников; Подвесные органайзеры для пеленания
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Change de bébé > Rangements pour couches: Organisateurs de sacs à couches; Caddies à couches; Empileurs de couches; Organisateurs de couches suspendus
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Tã/bỉm > Vật dụng đựng tã/bỉm: Túi xếp tã/bỉm; Hộp đựng tã/bỉm; Hộp xếp tã/bỉm; Túi treo đựng tã/bỉm
ko: 영유아 > 기저귀용품 > 기저귀 정리함: 기저귀 가방 정리용품; 기저귀 캐디; 기저귀 스태커; 걸이식 기저귀 정리함
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Przewijanie > Organizery na pieluchy: Organizery do toreb na pieluchy; Pojemniki na pieluchy; Worki na pieluchy; Wiszące organizery na pieluchy
nl: Baby en peuter > Luiermaterialen > Luierorganizers: Luiertasorganizers; Luiercaddy's; Luierstapelaars; Hangende luierorganizers
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 尿布 > 尿布收納袋: 尿布袋收納; 尿布提籃; 尿布整理袋; 吊掛式尿布收納袋
sk-SK: Bábätká > Prebaľovanie > Organizéry na plienky: Organizéry do tašky na plienky; Úložné koše na plienky; Visiace organizéry na plienky; Visiace organizéry na plienky
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Wickelbedarf > Windel-Organizer: Wickeltaschen-Organizer; Windeltaschen; Windelstapelbehälter; Windel-Organizer zum Aufhängen
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Articole scutece > Organizatoare pentru scutece: Organizatoare pentru genți pentru scutece; Cutii pentru scutece; Cutii pentru stivuirea scutecelor; Organizatoare suspendate pentru scutece
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Previjanje > Organizatorji za plenice: Organizatorji vrečk za plenice; Košarice za plenice; Vreče za shranjevanje plenic; Viseči organizatorji plenic
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Vystymas > Sauskelnių dėklai: Sauskelnių maišelių dėklai; Vežimėliai sauskelnėms; Vertikalūs sauskelnių dėklai; Pakabinami sauskelnių dėklai
pt-BR: Infantil > Troca de fraldas > Organizadores de fraldas: Organizadores de bolsas de fraldas; Porta-fraldas; Empilhadores de fraldas; Organizadores para pendurar fraldas
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 尿布相关用品 > 尿布收纳用品: 尿布袋收纳袋; 尿布盒; 尿布叠放器; 悬挂式尿布收纳盒
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Alt Alma Ürünleri > Bebek Bezi Kutuları: Bebek Bezi Çanta Düzenleyicileri; Bebek Bezi Taşıyıcıları; Bebek Bezi İstifleyiciler; Asılı Bebek Bezi Düzenleyicileri
nb: Baby og barn > Bleieutstyr > Bleieorganisering: Bleieveskeorganisering; Bleiecaddier; Bleistablere; Hengende bleieorganisering
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přebalování > Zásobníky na pleny: Tašky s organizérem pro dětské pleny; Košíky s organizérem pro dětské pleny; Stohovací zásobníky na dětské pleny; Závěsné organizéry na dětské pleny
en: Baby & Toddler > Diapering > Diaper Organizers: Diaper Bag Organizers; Diaper Caddies; Diaper Stackers; Hanging Diaper Organizers
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Pañales y cuidado del bebé > Organizadores de pañales: Organizadores de bolsas de pañales; Carritos para pañales; Apiladores de pañales; Organizadores de pañales colgantes
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Αλλαγή πάνας > Οργανωτές για πάνες: Οργανωτές τσάντας πάνας; Κουτιά/καλάθια για πάνες; Κρεμαστοί αποθηκευτικοί χώροι για πάνες; Κρεμαστοί οργανωτές για πάνες
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Смяна на пелени > Органайзери за пелени: Органайзери за чанти за бебешки принадлежности; Органайзери за пелени и аксесоари за повиване; Поставки за пелени; Висящи органайзери за пелени